test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngodiTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодинаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодидаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодидоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодинась
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодидась
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодидась
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодининзь
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодидинзь
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодидинзь
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодинаць
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодидаць
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодидонзь
     ӈодя+N+Tra: ӈодяӈэ
     ӈодя+N+Car: ӈодясиˮ
     ӈодя+N+Equ: ӈодядаремʼ
     ӈодя+N+Equ+Lat: ӈодядаревʼ
